lexc/adj/enhuadjmnevek.lexc
LEXICON Casei
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t       #;  ! at, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocase1i
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famim;

LEXICON Possim
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1oe§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1oe§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fami;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fami;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1oe§t§OEOEoe§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fami;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famim;

LEXICON Plurim
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Geni;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Geni;
                            Geni1ik;

LEXICON Famim
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geni;
                       Geni1ik;


LEXICON Geni1ik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casei;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casei;
                       Casei1ik;

LEXICON Casei1ik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez12e§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoe§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                           Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2oe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddAdjoptimista
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1optimista;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseopt;

Lexicon Tocaseopt
[stem]+Adj:0     Possopt;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluropt;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famopt;


LEXICON Possopt
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famopt;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famopt;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famopt;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famopt;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famopt;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famopt;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famopt;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Famopt;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famopt;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Famopt;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famopt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Famopt;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famopt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Famopt;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famopt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famopt;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famopt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Famopt;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famopt;

LEXICON Pluropt
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genopt;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Genopt; 
                            Genopt;

LEXICON Famopt
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genopt;
                       Genopt;

LEXICON Genopt
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseopt;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseopt;
                       Caseopt;

LEXICON Adj
affekta AddAdjoptimista;
agyagsárga AddAdjoptimista;
altruista AddAdjoptimista;
analfabéta AddAdjoptimista;
antagonista AddAdjoptimista;
antifasiszta AddAdjoptimista;
antikapitalista AddAdjoptimista;
antimarxista AddAdjoptimista;
antinikotinista AddAdjoptimista;
antiszocialista AddAdjoptimista;
apróka AddAdjoptimista;
aranysárga AddAdjoptimista;
automata AddAdjoptimista;
avantgardista AddAdjoptimista;
balga AddAdjoptimista;
bandzsa AddAdjoptimista;
bejárónőfajta AddAdjoptimista;
bigamista AddAdjoptimista;
botcsinálta AddAdjoptimista;
burnótbarna AddAdjoptimista;
báva AddAdjoptimista;
cifra AddAdjoptimista;
csalafinta AddAdjoptimista;
csira AddAdjoptimista;
csuda AddAdjoptimista;
csúnyácska AddAdjoptimista;
dekabrista AddAdjoptimista;
dokumentarista AddAdjoptimista;
durva AddAdjoptimista;
ebadta AddAdjoptimista;
egyforma AddAdjoptimista;
emberbarátfajta AddAdjoptimista;
evolucionista AddAdjoptimista;
fajtatiszta AddAdjoptimista;
fasza AddAdjoptimista;
feladatfajta AddAdjoptimista;
feminista AddAdjoptimista;
foltoska AddAdjoptimista;
fránya AddAdjoptimista;
fékomadta AddAdjoptimista;
félfasiszta AddAdjoptimista;
félárva AddAdjoptimista;
fűrészlapfajta AddAdjoptimista;
gesztenyebarna AddAdjoptimista;
goromba AddAdjoptimista;
gyatra AddAdjoptimista;
hadiárva AddAdjoptimista;
hangzásfajta AddAdjoptimista;
határozófajta AddAdjoptimista;
hitlerista AddAdjoptimista;
humanista AddAdjoptimista;
icurka-picurka AddAdjoptimista;
ilyenfajta AddAdjoptimista;
impresszionista AddAdjoptimista;
iromba AddAdjoptimista;
izmaelita AddAdjoptimista;
jogtiszta AddAdjoptimista;
jókora AddAdjoptimista;
kapitalista AddAdjoptimista;
kesze-kusza AddAdjoptimista;
kiskapitalista AddAdjoptimista;
kongreganista AddAdjoptimista;
kozmopolita AddAdjoptimista;
kurta AddAdjoptimista;
kálomista AddAdjoptimista;
kétakkora AddAdjoptimista;
könyvvezetésfajta AddAdjoptimista;
közteherfajta AddAdjoptimista;
lanyha AddAdjoptimista;
leninista AddAdjoptimista;
lilásbarna AddAdjoptimista;
légritka AddAdjoptimista;
madárlátta AddAdjoptimista;
magafajta AddAdjoptimista;
magatokfajta AddAdjoptimista;
magunkfajta AddAdjoptimista;
magyartarka AddAdjoptimista;
marxista AddAdjoptimista;
megbízásfajtákhoz AddAdjoptimista;
metállila AddAdjoptimista;
milyenforma AddAdjoptimista;
mogyoróbarna AddAdjoptimista;
moralista AddAdjoptimista;
munkaeszközfajta AddAdjoptimista;
méla AddAdjoptimista;
nacionalista AddAdjoptimista;
narancssárga AddAdjoptimista;
neofasiszta AddAdjoptimista;
nyalka AddAdjoptimista;
négerbarna AddAdjoptimista;
olajlenfajta AddAdjoptimista;
optimista AddAdjoptimista;
pacifista AddAdjoptimista;
paternalista AddAdjoptimista;
picurka AddAdjoptimista;
pirostarka AddAdjoptimista;
plutokrata AddAdjoptimista;
porzófajtaként AddAdjoptimista;
protekcionista AddAdjoptimista;
puszta AddAdjoptimista;
péksüteményfajta AddAdjoptimista;
randa AddAdjoptimista;
rendszámfajta AddAdjoptimista;
rezervista AddAdjoptimista;
romanista AddAdjoptimista;
rozoga AddAdjoptimista;
régifajta AddAdjoptimista;
satnya AddAdjoptimista;
siketnéma AddAdjoptimista;
soványka AddAdjoptimista;
suta AddAdjoptimista;
szaloncukorfajta AddAdjoptimista;
szemita AddAdjoptimista;
szimbolista AddAdjoptimista;
szittya AddAdjoptimista;
szobatiszta AddAdjoptimista;
szállásfajta AddAdjoptimista;
széljárta AddAdjoptimista;
szúrágta AddAdjoptimista;
szőkésbarna AddAdjoptimista;
sánta AddAdjoptimista;
sörárpafajta AddAdjoptimista;
süketnéma AddAdjoptimista;
tanítófajta AddAdjoptimista;
tereptarka AddAdjoptimista;
teszetosza AddAdjoptimista;
tompa AddAdjoptimista;
tropa AddAdjoptimista;
turista AddAdjoptimista;
törpefenyőfajta AddAdjoptimista;
ultranacionalista AddAdjoptimista;
vadkapitalista AddAdjoptimista;
varrásfajta AddAdjoptimista;
viaszpuha AddAdjoptimista;
világossárga AddAdjoptimista;
vékonyka AddAdjoptimista;
vízjárta AddAdjoptimista;
vörösbarna AddAdjoptimista;
zagyva AddAdjoptimista;
államkapitalista AddAdjoptimista;
ártatlanfajta AddAdjoptimista;
égegyadta AddAdjoptimista;
érzékelőfajta AddAdjoptimista;
önalkotta AddAdjoptimista;
újfasiszta AddAdjoptimista;
